California statutes. Elections Code
2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016

0117.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2002, 2003

0117.14--the following census blocks:

1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1038

0117.18--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016,
 2017, 2018

0117.20--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2001, 2002, 2012

0117.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

0218.10--the following census blocks:

2011, 2012

0218.20--the following census blocks:

2022, 2023, 2024

0218.21--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011

0219.13--the following census blocks:

4007, 4008,
 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024

0219.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2012

0219.18--the following census blocks:

1008

0740.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042,
 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052

0740.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

0741.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3012, 3013, 3014

0741.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015

0741.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003,
 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027

0741.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015

0741.11--the following census blocks:

1000

0744.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4015

0744.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006

0748.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

0754.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3028, 3029, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006,
 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011

0755.04--the following census blocks:

1022, 1024, 1025

0755.05--the following census blocks:

3010, 3011, 3033, 3034

0755.16--the following census blocks:

6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6019, 6020

0756.04--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2004, 2005, 2017, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 6005, 6006, 6007

0757.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1003, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3006, 3007

0757.03--the following census
 blocks:

3000, 3007

0758.15--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

0758.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013

0761.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007

0762.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021,
 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011

0762.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

0762.06--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

0864.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001,
 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008

0868.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

0868.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007

0875.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012,
 5013

0876.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 5000, 5001, 5002, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 7000, 7001, 7002

0878.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005

0879.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0879.02--the following census
 blocks:

3001, 3002, 3005

0881.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007

0883.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1012

0884.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002

0884.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020

0890.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3003

0891.02--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

0891.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

0891.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029

1101.13--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001

1102.01--the following census blocks:

1015

1102.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002

1102.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004

1104.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1005, 1006, 1007

1104.02--the following census blocks:

2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

1106.04--the following census blocks:

1020

1106.05--the following census blocks:

4006, 4007

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21447.

Congressional District 47 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 47

ORANGE

Whole Tracts in Orange County

0320.14, 0320.29, 0423.05, 0423.07, 0423.13, 0423.17, 0423.19, 0423.20, 0423.23, 0423.24, 0423.25, 0423.26, 0423.27, 0423.28, 0423.29, 0423.30, 0423.31, 0423.32, 0423.33, 0423.34, 0423.35, 0423.36, 0423.37, 0423.38, 0423.39, 0524.08, 0524.10, 0524.11, 0524.15, 0524.16, 0524.17, 0524.21, 0524.22, 0524.24, 0524.25, 0524.27, 0524.29, 0524.31, 0524.32, 0524.33, 0524.34, 0524.35, 0524.36, 0524.38, 0524.39, 0525.02, 0525.05, 0525.06, 0525.11, 0525.13, 0525.14, 0525.18, 0525.19, 0525.20, 0525.21, 0525.22, 0525.23, 0525.24, 0525.26,
 0525.27, 0525.28, 0525.29, 0525.30, 0525.31, 0525.32, 0525.33, 0525.34, 0525.35, 0626.05, 0626.11, 0626.19, 0626.20, 0626.22, 0626.25, 0626.26, 0626.27, 0626.28, 0626.29, 0626.30, 0626.31, 0626.32, 0626.33, 0626.34, 0626.35, 0626.36, 0626.37, 0626.38, 0626.39, 0626.40, 0626.41, 0626.45, 0626.46, 0626.47, 0626.48, 0626.49, 0626.50, 0626.51, 0626.52, 0626.53, 0626.54, 0626.55, 0626.56, 0626.57, 0626.58, 0744.08, 0755.06, 0755.07, 0755.12, 0755.13, 0755.14, 0755.17, 0755.18, 0756.03, 0756.06, 0756.07, 0757.02

Partial Tracts in Orange County

0219.14--the following census blocks:

2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0219.24--the following census blocks:

3040, 3041, 3042, 3044

0320.11--the following census blocks:

2035

0320.12--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3008, 3009

0320.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013

0320.15--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4008, 4009

0320.22--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008,
 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014

0320.27--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

0320.40--the following census blocks:

1009

0320.47--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001

0320.49--the following census blocks:

1001

0421.06--the following census
 blocks:

2023

0422.01--the following census blocks:

1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5037, 5038, 5039

0422.05--the following census blocks:

4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004,
 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019

0422.06--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2010, 2011, 2013

0423.11--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022

0423.15--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010,
 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013

0423.41--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009

0524.19--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017

0524.23--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0524.28--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1021, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4007, 4008, 5000, 5001

0524.30--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 7000, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009, 7010, 7011, 7012, 7013, 7014, 7015, 8000, 8001, 8002, 8003, 8004, 8005, 8006, 8007, 9002, 9007, 9008, 9009, 9010, 9011, 9012, 9013, 9020, 9021, 9022, 9023, 9024, 9025, 9026, 9027, 9028, 9029, 9030, 9031, 9032, 9033, 9034, 9035, 9036,
 9042, 9043, 9044, 9045, 9046, 9047, 9048, 9049, 9050, 9051, 9052, 9053, 9054, 9055, 9056, 9057

0524.37--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 4000, 4001, 4002, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5022, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 5050, 5051, 5052, 5055, 5056, 5057, 5058, 5059, 5060

0626.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007,
 1008, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5024, 5040, 5041, 5047, 5048, 5050, 5051, 5056, 5057, 5067, 5068, 5069, 5075, 5086, 5087, 5088, 5089, 5090, 5091, 5092, 5093, 5094, 5095, 5096

0626.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009, 7010, 7011, 7012, 7013, 7014, 8000, 8001, 8002, 8003, 8004, 8005, 8006, 8007, 8008, 8009, 8010, 8011, 8012, 8017, 8018, 8019, 8020, 8021, 8022, 8023, 8024, 8025, 8026, 8027, 8028, 8029

0626.43--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007

0630.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016

0631.01--the following census blocks:

1014, 1017, 1018

0740.03--the following census blocks:

1021

0744.06--the following census blocks:

4013, 4014

0744.07--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018

0754.03--the following census blocks:

3020, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027

0755.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015

0755.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006,
 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3035, 3036, 3037

0755.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 6009, 6010, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6018, 6021, 6022, 6023, 6024, 6025, 6026, 6027, 6028, 6029, 6030, 6031, 6032, 6033, 6034, 6035, 6036, 6037, 6038, 6039, 6040, 6041, 6042, 6043, 6044, 6045, 6046, 6047, 6048, 6049, 6050, 6051, 6052, 6053, 6054, 6055, 6056, 6057, 6058, 6059, 6060, 6061, 6062, 6063, 6064, 6065, 6066, 6067, 6068, 6069, 6070, 6071, 6072, 6073, 6074, 6075, 6076, 6079, 6080, 6081,
 6082, 6083, 6084, 6085, 6086, 6087, 6088, 6089, 6090, 6091, 6092, 6093, 6094, 6095, 6096, 6097, 6098, 6099, 6100, 6101, 6102, 6105, 6106, 6107, 6108, 6109

0756.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6018

0756.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

0757.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015,
 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2001, 3000, 3004, 3005, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022

0757.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

9901.00--the following census blocks:

0012, 0013, 0014, 0015, 0016, 0017, 0018, 0019, 0020, 0021, 0022

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21448.

Congressional District 48 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 48

RIVERSIDE

Whole Tracts in Riverside County

0427.23, 0432.01, 0432.02, 0432.03, 0432.04, 0432.05, 0432.07, 0432.08, 0432.16, 0432.17, 0432.18, 0432.20, 0432.22, 0432.46, 0432.48, 0432.52, 0432.56, 0432.62, 0432.64, 0432.65, 0432.66, 0432.67, 0432.92, 0432.93, 0432.94, 0432.95, 0432.96, 0432.97, 0432.98, 0433.06, 0433.07, 0433.08, 0433.09, 0433.10, 0433.12, 0433.13, 0433.14, 0433.15, 0433.16, 0433.18, 0433.19, 0434.01, 0434.03, 0434.04, 0434.05, 0435.03, 0435.05, 0435.19, 0435.20, 0444.06, 0444.07, 0446.02, 0446.04, 0446.05, 0447.01, 0448.04, 0448.05, 0448.06,
 0448.07, 9405.00, 9407.00, 9408.00, 9410.02, 9413.00, 9414.00

Partial Tracts in Riverside County

0427.20--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033

0427.26--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049,
 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067

0427.30--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021

0427.37--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098

0427.44--the following census blocks:

1016, 1017

0427.45--the following census blocks:

1013, 1014, 1015, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1029, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3017, 3018, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029

0432.35--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073,
 1075, 1076, 1077, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2033, 2034

0432.54--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1033, 1045, 1046, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

0433.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003,
 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026

0433.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2008, 2009

0435.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043,
 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003

0435.13--the following census blocks:

1029

0435.18--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024

0435.21--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004

0435.22--the following census blocks:

1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008,
 1009, 1010

0435.23--the following census blocks:

1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0435.24--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017

0437.01--the following census blocks:

1018, 1019, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027

0437.02--the following census blocks:

1003, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1032

0444.03--the following census blocks:

1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017,
 1042, 1046, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3040, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029

0444.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2021, 2022, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2059, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065

0444.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005,
 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3015, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3023, 3026, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048

0445.20--the following census blocks:

2057, 2058, 2059

0445.21--the following census blocks:

1044, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1102, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112

0445.24--the
 following census blocks:

2086, 2087, 2097, 2098, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2111, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2165, 2169

0446.06--the following census blocks:

1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 4008, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047

0447.02--the following census blocks:

1015

0449.04--the following census blocks:

3000, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3008, 3009

0449.11--the following census blocks:

3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013

0449.28--the following census blocks:

3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3015, 3017, 3018

0450.00--the following census blocks:

3006

0451.17--the following census blocks:

4000, 4013, 4014, 4015

0451.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036

0451.23--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023

0451.24--the following census blocks:

2020, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2039, 2040

0451.25--the following census
 blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3028, 4010

0451.27--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1021

0496.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016

0503.02--the following census blocks:

2014

0505.01--the following census blocks:

3008, 3009, 3010, 3013, 3019, 3020

0505.03--the following census blocks:

3008

0507.01--the following census blocks:

1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1062

0512.00--the following census blocks:

1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3007, 3008, 3009

9410.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017

9411.00--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1010, 1011

9412.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018

SAN DIEGO

Whole Tracts in San Diego County

0185.16, 0185.17, 0185.18, 0185.19, 0190.02, 0191.07,
 0191.08, 0191.09, 0192.03, 0192.05, 0192.06, 0192.08, 0192.09, 0192.10, 0194.03, 0194.04, 0194.05, 0194.06, 0195.01, 0195.02, 0195.03, 0196.01, 0196.02, 0197.02, 0199.02, 0199.03, 0199.05, 0200.21, 0200.23, 0200.24, 0200.25, 0200.26, 0200.28, 0200.29, 0200.36, 0200.37, 0200.38, 0200.39, 0200.40, 0200.41, 0200.44, 0201.08, 0201.09, 0202.02, 0202.06, 0202.07, 0202.08, 0202.09, 0202.11, 0202.13, 0202.14, 0203.05, 0203.08, 0206.01, 0210.01, 0210.02

Partial Tracts in San Diego County

0171.12--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1012, 1013, 1017

0171.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

0185.22--the following census blocks:

1015, 1021, 1022

0186.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 1004, 1012, 1013, 1014

0190.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028

0191.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006,
 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016

0191.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025

0191.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3018, 3021, 3022, 3023,
 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027

0191.11--the following census blocks:

2000, 2009, 2011, 2016

0193.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0193.04--the following census blocks:

2006, 2007, 2008

0193.05--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2025

0197.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009,
 2010

0198.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003

0198.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0198.09--the following census blocks:

1000

0198.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042

0198.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1021, 1022

0199.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

0200.17--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2030, 2031, 2032, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003

0200.19--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0200.31--the following census blocks:

3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017

0200.32--the following census blocks:

2009

0200.42--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

0200.43--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

0201.05--the following census blocks:

1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002

0201.06--the following census blocks:

1009, 1011, 1013, 1016, 2001, 2004, 2005

0201.07--the following census blocks:

1015, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005

0201.10--the following census blocks:

2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015,
 2016, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3016, 3017, 3040

0201.11--the following census blocks:

1015, 2018, 2020, 2021

0202.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005

0203.04--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028

0203.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017

0203.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

0203.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1008, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1029, 1030, 2021, 2023, 2024

0203.13--the
 following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1018, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

0204.03--the following census blocks:
